Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 3, chapter 786, Oregon Laws 2013, as amended by  section 3, chapter 812,
Oregon Laws 2015, and section 4, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  (1) The Regional Infrastructure Fund is established in the State  Treasury, separate and
distinct from  the General Fund. Interest earned on the moneys in the Regional Infrastructure Fund
shall be credited to the fund. The Regional Infrastructure Fund consists of moneys deposited in  the
fund under section  2, chapter 786, Oregon Laws 2013, [ and] section 2, chapter 812, Oregon Laws
2015, and section 3 [ of this 2017 Act ], chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017 , and may  include fees, re-
venues or other income deposited into the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to  the Oregon Business Development De-
partment for disbursement to local governments and federally recognized Indian tribes located
in this state  for the purposes set  forth in section 2, chapter 786, Oregon Laws 2013, [ and] section
2, chapter  812,  Oregon Laws 2015, and section 3 [ of this 2017  Act ], chapter 748, Oregon Laws
2017.
Enrolled Senate Bill 219 (SB 219-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate February 26, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House May 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 219 (SB 219-A) Page 2